Illinois, session 104th, HB4292.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fire Protection District Act is amended by 5adding Section 22.2 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 705/22.2 new)7    Sec. 22.2. Transfers from ambulance funds. Notwithstanding 8any other provision of law, the board of trustees of a fire 9protection district may, by majority vote of the board of 10trustees, adopt a resolution to transfer moneys from the fire 11protection district's ambulance service fund to another fund 12controlled by the fire protection district if:13        (1) the fire protection district has not approved 14    another transfer from the fire protection district's 15    ambulance service fund under this Section in the same 16    year;17        (2) the moneys remaining in the fire protection 18    district's ambulance service fund after the transfer are 19    sufficient to pay for the remaining obligations and costs 20    payable from the fire protection district's ambulance 21    service fund in the current and subsequent fiscal years; 22    and23        (3) the transfer does not impair the fire protection   HB4292 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16412 RTM 29802 b1    district's finances or public safety mission, including, 2    but not limited to, emergency medical services, ambulance 3    services, rescue services, fire suppression services, or 4    any other public safety endeavor established by the fire 5    protection district. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.